Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15.1 Water Supply Facilities
46-15.1-15.
Bonds and notes eligible for investment.

Bonds and notes issued by the board hereunder are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, banks, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, savings institutions, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds and notes are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1.

46-15.1-16.
Negotiable instruments.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this chapter or any recitals in any bonds and notes issued by the board hereunder, all the bonds and notes shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of the state and investment securities under the Uniform Commercial Code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1.

46-15.1-17.
Refunding bonds.

The board may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying any of its bonds issued hereunder at maturity or upon acceleration or redemption. The refunding bonds may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide the principal of the bonds being refunded, together with any redemption premium thereon, any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of payment of the bonds, the expenses of issue of the refunding bonds, the expenses of redeeming the bonds being refunded, and such reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses from the proceeds of the refunding bonds as may be required by a trust agreement or resolution securing bonds or notes. The refunding bonds may be issued at such time or times simultaneous with or prior to the maturity, acceleration, or redemption date of the bonds being refunded as the board may determine to be in the public interest.

The proceeds of bonds or notes issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds or notes may be applied, in the discretion of the board, to the purchase, retirement at maturity, or redemption of those outstanding bonds or notes either on their earliest or a subsequent redemption date, and may, pending that application, be placed in escrow. Any escrowed proceeds may be invested and reinvested in obligations of or guaranteed by the United States, or in certificates of deposit, time deposits, or repurchase agreements fully secured or guaranteed by the state or the United States, or an instrumentality of either, maturing at such time or times as shall be appropriate to assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds and notes to be so refunded. The interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on any investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding bonds or notes to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of the proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof may be returned to the board for use by it in furtherance of its purposes.

The issue of refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the board in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of bonds, other than refunding bonds, insofar as the provisions may be applicable, but no bonds shall be refunded to a date more than forty (40) years from the date of their original issue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 49.

46-15.1-17.1.
Dissolution.

If the board shall be dissolved all funds of the board not required for the payment of bonds shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state, and all property belonging to the board shall be vested in the state and delivered to it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 56, § 5.

46-15.1-17.2.
Inconsistent provisions.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or ordinance, general, special or local, or of any municipal charter or of any rule or regulation of the state or any municipality, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 56, § 7.

46-15.1-17.3.
Limitation of powers.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds issued by the board pursuant to this chapter that the state will not alter or limit the rights hereby vested in the board to fulfill the terms of any agreement made with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of bondholders, until the bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders are fully met and discharged. The board is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with bondholders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 6.

46-15.1-18.
Severability — Constructions.

If any provision of this chapter shall be held invalid in any circumstance, the invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or circumstances.

This chapter shall be construed in all respects so as to meet all constitutional requirements. In carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, all steps shall be taken which are necessary to meet constitutional requirements whether or not those steps are required by statute.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purposes. The powers granted hereby shall be in addition to, independent of, and not in substitution for any other powers granted by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1.

46-15.1-19.
Surface reservoirs.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, no provision of this chapter, nor any language contained therein, shall allow or permit any funds, proceeds, revenues, or other sums of money derived by, through, or from the issuance of revenue bonds as authorized under this chapter, to be used for the design or construction of any surface reservoirs, without the approval of the general assembly, or to be used in connection with the acquisition of sites for the development of surface reservoirs through the exercise by the water resources board of the power of eminent domain as provided under § 46-15.1-5(15) and in accordance with the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 2.

46-15.1-19.1.
Big River Reservoir — Administration.

The Rhode Island water resources board, established pursuant to this chapter and chapter 15 of this title, shall be the only designated agency which will administer those lands acquired for the Big River Reservoir as established under section 23 of chapter 133 of the Public Laws of 1964. The director of the department of environmental management and the director’s authorized agents, employees, and designees shall, together with the water resources board in accordance with the Big River management area land use plan for the lands, protect the natural resources of the Big River Reservoir lands. The lands of the Big River Reservoir are subject to enforcement authority of the department of environmental management, as provided for in chapter 17.1 of title 42, and as provided for in title 20 of the General Laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 284, § 1.

46-15.1-20.
Water development account fund.

There is created a special fund called
“water development fund”
, a general revenue fund within the general fund, which shall record any net proceeds which may be paid to the state as a result of the lease of any reservoir sites or other facilities as may be acquired or constructed by the state in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or as otherwise authorized or permitted, or as a result of the sale of surplus property or any interest therein, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the sale of excess gravel, timber, or other materials located on the reservoir sites or other facilities. Monies are to be deposited as general revenues. The amounts appropriated shall be made available for the purposes authorized by this chapter, and also hereby made available for borrowing from the board, in accordance with and pursuant to the provisions of this chapter exclusive of acquisition of reservoir sites, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment or loan of such sums or such portions thereof as may be required, from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 6; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 76, § 9; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 159; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 2.

46-15.1-21.
Annual report of water provider.

Each water providing and water supply company both public and private doing business in this state shall forward an annual report to the water resources board setting forth the status of any water supply within the company’s jurisdiction and control, and progress made towards achieving the goals of the entity’s water supply management plan as prescribed in §§

46-15.3-5.1

and

46-15.3-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 104, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 126, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 7; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 7.

46-15.1-22.
Discontinuation of borrowing authority and abolishment of water resources board (corporate).

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including, but not limited to, §

46-15.1-10

, upon the effective date of this section, the water resources board (corporate), established as a body politic and corporate and public instrumentality pursuant to this chapter, shall be prohibited from borrowing money or issuing bonds for any purpose.

The water resources board (corporate) shall continue to repay existing debt until all such debt is fully repaid. Upon the repayment by the water resources board (corporate) of all such existing obligations, the water resources board (corporate) shall be dissolved and all existing functions and duties of the water resources board (corporate) shall be transferred to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, a body politic and corporate and public instrumentality of the state established pursuant to chapter 12.2 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 5, § 6; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 20.